coding-challenge/apertium-en-es/apertium-en-es.en-es-lextor.dix
<pardef n="arabic-roman-ord">
    <e><p><l>10th</l><r>X</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>11th</l><r>XI</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>12th</l><r>XII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>13th</l><r>XIII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>14th</l><r>XIV</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>15th</l><r>XV</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>16th</l><r>XVI</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>17th</l><r>XVII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>18th</l><r>XVIII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>19th</l><r>XIX</r></p></e>

    <e><par n="arabic-roman-tens-ord"/></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="B.C.-a._C.">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>BC</l><r><b/>aC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>B.C</l><r><b/>a.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    

    <e><p><l><b/>B.<b/>C</l><r><b/>a.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>AD</l><r><b/>dC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>A.D</l><r><b/>d.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    

    <e><p><l><b/>A.<b/>D</l><r><b/>d.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>CE</l><r><b/>dC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>C.E</l><r><b/>d.C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>C.<b/>E</l><r><b/>d.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>BCE</l><r><b/>aC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>B.C.E</l><r><b/>a.C</r></p></e>

    

    

    

    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e><p><l/><r>siglo<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>century</l><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l/><r>siglos<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>and<b/></l><r><b/>y<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l/><r>siglos<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l>-</l><r>-</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
